Utah statutes.
63J-1-505.   Payment of fees prerequisite to service -- Exception.

(1) (a)  State and county officers required by law to charge fees may not perform any official service unless the fees prescribed for that service are paid in advance.

(b)  When the fee is paid, the officer shall perform the services required.

(c)  An officer is liable upon the officer's official bond for every failure or refusal to perform an official duty when the fees are tendered.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), no fees may be charged:

(i)  to the officer's state, or any county or subdivision of the state;

(ii)  to any public officer acting for the state, county, or subdivision;

(iii)  in cases of habeas corpus;

(iv)  in criminal causes before final judgment;

(v)  for administering and certifying the oath of office;

(vi)  for swearing pensioners and their witnesses; or

(vii)  for filing and recording bonds of public officers.

(b)  Fees may be charged for payment:

(i)  of recording fees for assessment area recordings in compliance with Section 11-42-205;

(ii)  of recording fees for judgments recorded in compliance with Sections 57-3-106 and 78A-7-117; and

(iii)  to the state engineer under Section 73-2-14.

